test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-iskwew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - iskwêw - ok : # -m animate noun
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg: iskwêw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl: iskwêwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Loc: iskwênâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Obv: iskwêwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [iskwês, iskwêsis] # both are documented
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [iskwêsak, iskwêsisak]
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [iskwêsihk, iskwêsinâhk, iskwêsisinâhk‚ iskwêsisihk]
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêm
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêmak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêma
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêminânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêminawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitiskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitiskwêmis
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitiskwêmisinân
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitiskwêmisinaw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmisiwâw
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmisiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitiskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitiskwêmisak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otiskwêmisa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otiskwêmisiyiwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitiskwêmisinânak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitiskwêmisinawak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitiskwêmisiwâwak
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otiskwêmisiwâwa
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otiskwêmisiyiwa
     
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otiskwêmihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otiskwêmiyihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitiskwêminâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitiskwêminâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitiskwêmiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otiskwêmiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otiskwêmiyihk

     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitiskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitiskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otiskwêmisihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otiskwêmisiyihk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitiskwêmisinâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitiskwêmisinâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitiskwêmisiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otiskwêmisiwâhk
     iskwêw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otiskwêmisiyihk
